Nebraska, session 109, LB925.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB925 LB925
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Safe Parks and Public Spaces Act.
Sec. 2. The purpose of the Safe Parks and Public Spaces Act is to
protect the public from the dangers of unauthorized street camping in
public parks, rights-of-way, and other public spaces. The Legislature
recognizes the risk presented by unauthorized street camping, including
conduct that results in the proliferation of drugs and drug
paraphernalia, threats of random acts of violence, and the spread of
disease and detritus. It is the intention of the Legislature to protect
the people of Nebraska in public spaces and rights-of-way by enacting a
prohibition on unauthorized street camping.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Safe Parks and Public Spaces Act:
(1) Camp means to sleep upon, occupy, or otherwise use an area as a
substitute for regular shelter, as evidenced by, but not limited to, the
erection of a tent or other temporary shelter, the presence of bedding or
pillows, or the storage of personal property;
(2) Campsite means a regular location of public grounds that is
designated as a recreational camping ground, area, or facility and that
allows temporary overnight occupancy without a permanently fixed
structure;
(3) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
and
(4) State funds means funds designated for addressing housing or
homelessness and includes state aid and federal funds.
Sec. 4. (1) It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly or
intentionally camp upon or in any public property or right-of-way that is
not designated by the state or the political subdivision controlling such
property or right-of-way as:
(a) A campsite; or
(b) A temporary site for an unsanctioned homeless encampment.
(2) A violation of this section is a Class V misdemeanor, except
-2-

LB925 LB925
2026 2026
that for a first offense, in lieu of prosecution, the law enforcement
officer shall direct the person to the nearest appropriate shelter for
homeless individuals.
Sec. 5. (1) A political subdivision shall not authorize or
otherwise allow any person to regularly camp or sleep upon or in any
public property or right-of-way in violation of section 4 of this act.
(2) A political subdivision shall not prohibit or discourage a law
enforcement officer or prosecuting attorney who is employed or otherwise
under the direction or control of the political subdivision from
enforcing section 4 of this act or any order or ordinance prohibiting
camping, sleeping, or obstruction of sidewalks or other rights-of-way.
Sec. 6. (1) A person described in subsection (2) of this section
who is aggrieved by a violation of section 5 of this act may bring a
civil action for appropriate relief against the political subdivision
violating such section.
(2) The following persons may bring an action under this section:
(a) A resident of the county in which the violation is occurring;
(b) A person who owns a business located in the county in which the
violation is occurring; or
(c) The Attorney General.
(3) In a civil action under this section, appropriate relief
includes:
(a) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as
may be appropriate; and
(b) For an action brought by a person other than the Attorney
General, reasonable expenses incurred in bringing the civil action,
including court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, investigative costs,
witness fees, and deposition costs.
(4) A civil action under this section must be accompanied by an
affidavit from the plaintiff attesting that:
(a) The plaintiff provided written notice of the alleged violation
-3-

LB925 LB925
2026 2026
of section 5 of this act to the governing board of the political
subdivision;
(b) The political subdivision did not cure the alleged violation
within five business days after receiving such notice; and
(c) The political subdivision has failed to take all reasonable
actions within the limits of its authority to cure the alleged violation
within such five-business-day period.
Sec. 7. (1) If the department determines that a political
subdivision is in violation of section 5 of this act, the department
shall notify the State Treasurer of such fact. Upon receiving such
notice, the State Treasurer shall suspend distribution of state funds to
the political subdivision.
(2) For each day a political subdivision is found to be out of
compliance with section 5 of this act, the political subdivision shall
forfeit a pro-rata amount of state funds equal to the amount of state
funds awarded or provided to the political subdivision divided by the
days in the award or funding period.
(3) The State Treasurer shall suspend distribution of state funds to
a political subdivision under this section until the department notifies
the State Treasurer that the political subdivision is in compliance with
section 5 of this act. Any funds held by the State Treasurer for six
months or longer shall be forfeited and returned to the General Fund.
Sec. 8. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 9. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-